Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF2387.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 121A.038, subdivision 7, is amended to read: Subd. 7. Violence prevention. (a) A school district or charter school conducting an active shooter drill must provide students in middle school and high school at least one hour, or one standard class period, of violence prevention training annually. (b) The violence prevention training must be evidence-based and may be delivered in-person, virtually, or digitally. Training must, at a minimum, teach students the following: (1) how to identify observable warning signs and signals of an individual who may be at risk of harming oneself or others; (2) the importance of taking threats seriously and seeking help; and (3) the steps to report dangerous, violent, threatening, harmful, or potentially harmful activitynew text begin , including providing information about the Department of Public Safety's statewide anonymous threat reporting system and any local threat reporting systemsnew text end . (c) By July 1, 2024, the commissioner of public safety and the commissioner of education must jointly develop a list of evidence-based trainings that a school district or charter school may use to fulfill the requirements of this section, including no-cost programming, if any. The agencies must: (1) post the list publicly on the Minnesota School Safety Center's website; and (2) update the list every two years. (d) A school district or charter school must ensure that students have the opportunity to contribute to their school's safety and violence prevention planning, aligned with the recommendations for multihazard planning for schools, including but not limited to: (1) student opportunities for leadership related to prevention and safety; (2) encouragement and support to students in establishing clubs and programs focused on safety; and (3) providing students with the opportunity to seek help from adults and to learn about prevention connected to topics including bullying, sexual harassment, sexual assault, and suicide. Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 121A.06, is amended to read: 121A.06 REPORTS OF DANGEROUS WEAPON INCIDENTS new text begin AND ACTIVE SHOOTER INCIDENTS new text end IN SCHOOL ZONES. Subdivision 1. Definitions. As used in this section: new text begin (1) "active shooter incident" means an event involving an armed individual or individuals on campus or an armed assailant in the immediate vicinity of the school; new text end new text begin (2) "active shooter threat" means a real or perceived threat that an active shooter incident will occur; new text end deleted text begin (1)deleted text end new text begin (3)new text end "dangerous weapon" has the meaning given it in section 609.02, subdivision 6; deleted text begin (2)deleted text end new text begin (4)new text end "school" has the meaning given it in section 120A.22, subdivision 4; and deleted text begin (3)deleted text end new text begin (5)new text end "school zone" has the meaning given it in section 152.01, subdivision 14a, clauses (1) and (3). Subd. 2. new text begin Dangerous weapons new text end reports; content. School districts must electronically report to the commissioner of education incidents involving the use or possession of a dangerous weapon in school zones. The deleted text begin formdeleted text end new text begin reportnew text end must include the following information: (1) a description of each incident, including a description of the dangerous weapon involved in the incident; (2) where, at what time, and under what circumstances the incident occurred; (3) information about the offender, other than the offender's name, including the offender's age; whether the offender was a student and, if so, where the offender attended school; and whether the offender was under school expulsion or suspension at the time of the incident; (4) information about the victim other than the victim's name, if any, including the victim's age; whether the victim was a student and, if so, where the victim attended school; and if the victim was not a student, whether the victim was employed at the school; (5) the cost of the incident to the school and to the victim; and (6) the action taken by the school administration to respond to the incident. The commissioner shall provide an electronic reporting format that allows school districts to provide aggregate data. new text begin Subd. 2a. new text end new text begin Active shooter reports; content. new text end new text begin (a) School districts must electronically report active shooter incidents and active shooter threats to the Minnesota Fusion Center. The report must include the following information: new text end new text begin (1) a description of each incident or threat; new text end new text begin (2) how the active shooter threat was communicated, including whether the threat was communicated through social media or email; new text end new text begin (3) information about the individual, other than the individual's name, including the individual's age; whether the individual was a student and, if so, where the individual attended school; and whether the individual was under school expulsion or suspension at the time of the incident; new text end new text begin (4) the immediate cost of the incident to the school, if any; new text end new text begin (5) the action taken by the school administration to respond to the incident or threat, including any referrals to law enforcement or mental health professionals; and new text end new text begin (6) the law enforcement agency or agencies with jurisdiction over the school, even if the incident did not result in a referral to law enforcement. new text end new text begin (b) Reports required under paragraph (a) must be submitted on a form provided by the Minnesota Fusion Center and in a manner consistent with the reporting school's safety plan. The Minnesota Fusion Center must consult with the Minnesota School Safety Center in creation of the reporting form. new text end Subd. 3. Reports; filing requirements. By July 31 of each year, each public school shall report incidents involving the use or possession of a dangerous weapon in school zones to the commissioner. The reports must be submitted using the electronic reporting system developed by the commissioner under subdivision 2. The commissioner shall compile the information it receives from the schools and report it annually to the commissioner of public safety and the legislature. Sec. 3. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 299C.055, is amended to read: 299C.055 LEGISLATIVE REPORT ON FUSION CENTER ACTIVITIES. (a) The superintendent must prepare an annual report for the public and the legislature on the Minnesota Fusion Center (MNFC) that includes general information about the MNFC; the types of activities it monitors; the scale of information it collects; the local, state, and federal agencies with which it shares information; and the quantifiable benefits it produces. None of the reporting requirements in this section supersede chapter 13 or any other state or federal law. The superintendent must report on activities for the preceding calendar year unless another time period is specified. The report must include the following information, to the extent allowed by other law: (1) the MNFC's operating budget for the current biennium, number of staff, and staff duties; (2) the number of publications generated and an overview of the type of information provided in the publications, including products such as law enforcement briefs, partner briefs, risk assessments, threat assessments, and operational reports; (3) a summary of audit findings for the MNFC and what corrective actions were taken pursuant to audits; (4) the number of data requests received by the MNFC and a general description of those requests; (5) the types of surveillance and data analysis technologies utilized by the MNFC, such as artificial intelligence or social media analysis tools; (6) a description of the commercial and governmental databases utilized by the MNFC to the extent permitted by law; (7) the number of suspicious activity reports (SARs) received and processed by the MNFC; (8) the number of SARs received and processed by the MNFC that were converted into Bureau of Criminal Apprehension case files, that were referred to the Federal Bureau of Investigation, or that were referred to local law enforcement agencies; (9) the number of SARs received and processed by the MNFC that involve an individual on the Terrorist Screening Center watchlist; (10) the number of requests for information (RFIs) that the MNFC received from law enforcement agencies and the number of responses to federal requests for RFIs; (11) the names of the federal agencies the MNFC received data from or shared data with; (12) the names of the agencies that submitted SARs; (13) a summary description of the MNFC's activities with the Joint Terrorism Task Force; deleted text begin anddeleted text end (14) the number of investigations aided by the MNFC's use of SARs and RFIsdeleted text begin .deleted text end new text begin ;new text end new text begin (15) the number of tips received through the Department of Public Safety's anonymous threat reporting system, including the See It, Say It, Send It application, and the number of those tips that the MNFC processed; and new text end new text begin (16) the number of active shooter incident reports received from school districts pursuant to section 121A.06, subdivision 2a, paragraph (b), a summary of the reports, and the number of reports that were converted into Bureau of Criminal Apprehension case files, that were referred to the Federal Bureau of Investigation, or that were referred to local law enforcement agencies. new text end (b) The report shall be provided to the chairs and ranking minority members of the committees of the house of representatives and senate with jurisdiction over data practices and public safety issues, and shall be posted on the MNFC website by February 15 each year beginning on February 15, 2024. Sec. 4. new text begin APPROPRIATION; ANONYMOUS THREAT REPORTING SYSTEM GRANTS.new text end new text begin (a) $....... in fiscal year 2026 is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of public safety for the Division of Homeland Security and Emergency Management, in consultation with the Minnesota School Safety Center, to issue anonymous threat reporting system grants to school districts, charter schools, or cooperative units. new text end new text begin (b) A school district, charter school, or cooperative unit under Minnesota Statutes, section 123A.24, may apply for a grant in the form and manner specified by the Division of Homeland Security and Emergency Management. The Division of Homeland Security and Emergency Management may establish grant application timelines and may award grants in more than one round. Grants may be awarded in an amount not to exceed $....... per district, charter school, or cooperative unit. Grants must be awarded to schools located in all geographic regions of the state with at least half of the grants awarded to school districts, charter schools, and cooperative units with administrative offices located outside of the 11-county metropolitan area. new text end new text begin (c) A grant recipient must use grant money to develop and implement anonymous threat reporting systems. new text end new text begin (d) Before a grant is awarded, the district, charter school, or cooperative unit must provide documentation acceptable to the director of the Division of Homeland Security and Emergency Management on how the grant will be used, including identification of how staff will be responsible for responding to threats received through the anonymous threat reporting system. new text end new text begin (e) The Department of Public Safety may retain up to ten percent of the appropriation for the Division of Homeland Security and Emergency Management to administer the grants and for the Minnesota School Safety Center to provide districts, charter schools, and cooperative units technical assistance. new text end new text begin (f) By February 15 following each year a grant is awarded under this section, the Minnesota School Safety Center, Division of Homeland Security and Emergency Management, and Department of Public Safety must report to the chairs and ranking minority members of the legislative committees with jurisdiction over kindergarten through grade 12 education and public safety on how grant money was awarded and distributed. The report must identify the grant recipients and how the grant money was used by each recipient. new text end new text begin (g) This is a onetime appropriation. This appropriation does not cancel but is available until June 30, 2028. new text end